Utah statutes.
54-9-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Common facilities" means all works and facilities:

(a)  owned or used by two or more public power entities or power utilities; and

(b)  necessary to the generation, transmission, or distribution of electric power and energy.

(2)  "Interlocal entity" has the same meaning as provided in Section 11-13-103.

(3)  "Power utility":

(a)  means a public agency, as defined in Section 11-13-103, or other person engaged in generating, transmitting, distributing, or marketing electric power and energy; and

(b)  does not include a public power entity.

(4)  "Public power entity" means:

(a)  a city or town that owns a system for the generation, transmission, or distribution of electric power and energy for public or private use; and

(b)  an interlocal entity.



Amended by Chapter 345, 2012 General Session

